src/morphology/stems/subjunctions.lexc
LEXICON CS 
+CS: #;

LEXICON Subjunction
ages   CS "than" ;
awos  CS "because, though, for the sake of, in spite of" ; 
drefenn  CS "because, on account of" ;
erna  CS "till, until" ;
ernag  CS "till, until" ;
es   CS "than" ;
ha  CS "and (before consonants), while, then, and so" ;
hedra  CS "while, as long as" ;
ma  CS "so that" ;
ma’s   CS "unless" ;
maga   CS "as" ;
mar   CS "if, if only" ;
mar’s   CS "unless" ;
mara   CS "if" ;
maras   CS "if" ;
marnas  CS "unless, except, save" ;
mars   CS "if" ;
may   CS "so that" ;
mayth   CS "so that (before vowels)" ;
ytho  CS "therefore, then, so, well then, in that case" ; 
